Utah statutes.
70A-9a-524.    Delay by filing office.
Delay by the filing office beyond a time limit prescribed by this part is
excused if:
(1)  the delay is caused by interruption of communication or computer
facilities, war, emergency conditions, failure of equipment, or other
circumstances beyond control of the filing office; and
(2)  the filing office exercises reasonable diligence under the circumstances.
